New Mexico, session 2026, SB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 7-17-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1966,
Chapter 49, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Liquor Excise
Tax Act:
A. "alcoholic beverages" means distilled or
rectified spirits, potable alcohol, brandy, whiskey, rum, gin,
aromatic bitters or any similar beverage, including blended or
fermented beverages, dilutions or mixtures of one or more of
the foregoing containing more than one-half of one percent
.234068.1

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
alcohol by volume, but "alcoholic beverages" does not include
medicinal bitters;
B. "barrel" means the equivalent of thirty-one
gallons;
[B.] C. "beer" means an alcoholic beverage obtained
by the fermentation of any infusion or decoction of barley,
malt and hops or other cereals in water and includes porter,
beer, ale and stout;
[C.] D. "cider" means an alcoholic beverage made
from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound,
ripe apples or pears that contains not less than one-half of
one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than eight and
one-half percent of alcohol by volume;
[D.] E. "department" means the taxation and revenue
department, the secretary of taxation and revenue or any
employee of the department exercising authority lawfully
delegated to that employee by the secretary;
[E.] F. "fortified wine" means wine containing more
than fourteen percent alcohol by volume when bottled or
packaged by the manufacturer, but "fortified wine" does not
include:
(1) wine that is sealed or capped by cork
closure and aged two years or more;

(2) wine that contains more than fourteen

percent alcohol by volume solely as a result of the natural

.234068.1
- 2 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
fermentation process and that has not been produced with the
addition of wine spirits, brandy or alcohol; or
(3) vermouth and sherry;
[F.] G. "microbrewer" means a person who produces
less than two hundred thousand barrels of beer per year;
[G.] H. "person" includes, to the extent permitted
by law, a federal, state or other governmental unit or
subdivision or an agency, department, institution or
instrumentality thereof;
I. "retailer" means a person having a place of
business in New Mexico that sells alcoholic beverages in New
Mexico, offers alcoholic beverages for sale in New Mexico or
possesses alcoholic beverages for the purpose of selling the
alcoholic beverages in New Mexico;
[H.] J. "small winegrower" means a winegrower who
produces less than one million five hundred thousand liters of
wine in a year;
[I.] K. "spirituous liquors" means alcoholic
beverages, except fermented beverages such as wine, beer, cider
and ale;
[J.] L. "wholesaler" means a person holding a

license issued under Section 60-6A-1 NMSA 1978 or a person 22
selling alcoholic beverages that were not purchased from a

person holding a license issued under Section 60-6A-1 NMSA

1978;

.234068.1
- 3 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
[K.] M. "wine" means an alcoholic beverage other
than cider that is obtained by the fermentation of the natural
sugar contained in fruit or other agricultural products, with
or without the addition of sugar or other products, and that
does not contain more than twenty-one percent alcohol by
volume; and
[L.] N. "winegrower" means a person licensed
pursuant to Section 60-6A-11 NMSA 1978."
SECTION 2. A new section of the Liquor Excise Tax Act,
Section 7-17-5.2 NMSA 1978, is enacted to read:
"7-17-5.2. [NEW MATERIAL] IMPOSITION AND RATE OF LIQUOR
EXCISE SURTAX.--Beginning July 1, 2027, there is imposed on a
retailer that sells alcoholic beverages not for resale an
excise surtax, to be referred to as the "liquor excise surtax",
at the rate of three percent of the price paid for alcoholic
beverages sold by the retailer."
SECTION 3. Section 7-17-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1984,
Chapter 85, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-6. DEDUCTION--INTERSTATE SALES--WINEGROWER-TO-
WINEGROWER TRANSFERS.--
A. A wholesaler may deduct the liters of spirituous
liquors, gallons of beer and liters of wine sold and shipped to
a person in another state from the units of alcoholic beverages
subject to the [tax] taxes imposed by the Liquor Excise Tax
Act; provided that the department may require the wholesaler to
.234068.1
- 4 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
submit evidence satisfactory to the department that the units
have been sold and shipped to a person in another state.
B. A winegrower may deduct the liters of wine
transferred to the winegrower from another winegrower for
processing, bottling or storage and subsequent return to the
transferor from the units of wine subject to the [liquor
excise tax] taxes imposed by the Liquor Excise Tax Act on the
licensed premises of the winegrower."
SECTION 4. Section 7-17-9 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1966,
Chapter 49, Section 7, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-9. EXEMPTION--CERTAIN SALES TO OR BY
INSTRUMENTALITIES OF ARMED FORCES.--Exempted from the [tax]
taxes imposed by [Section 7-17-5 NMSA 1978] the Liquor Excise
Tax Act are alcoholic beverages sold to or by any
instrumentality of the armed forces of the United States
engaged in resale activities."
SECTION 5. Section 7-17-10 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1966,
Chapter 49, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-10. DATE PAYMENT DUE.--The [tax] taxes imposed by
the Liquor Excise Tax Act [is] are to be paid on or before the
twenty-fifth day of the month following the month in which the
taxable event occurs."
SECTION 6. Section 7-17-11 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969,
Chapter 80, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-11. REFUND OR CREDIT OF [TAX] TAXES.--The
.234068.1
- 5 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
department shall allow a claim for refund or credit as provided
in Sections 7-1-26 and 7-1-29 NMSA 1978 for the [tax] taxes
imposed by [Section 7-17-5 NMSA 1978] the Liquor Excise Tax Act
and paid on alcoholic beverages destroyed in shipment, spoiled
or otherwise damaged as to be unfit for sale or consumption
upon submission of proof satisfactory to the department of such
destruction, spoilage or damage."
SECTION 7. Section 7-17-12 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1984,
Chapter 85, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-17-12. INTERPRETATION OF ACT--ADMINISTRATION AND
ENFORCEMENT OF [TAX] TAXES.--
A. The department shall interpret the provisions of
the Liquor Excise Tax Act.
B. The department shall administer and enforce the
collection of the [liquor excise tax] taxes imposed by the
Liquor Excise Tax Act, and the Tax Administration Act applies
to the administration and enforcement of the [tax] taxes."
SECTION 8. Section 60-6A-11.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2011,
Chapter 109, Section 1) is amended to read:
"60-6A-11.1. DIRECT WINE SHIPMENT PERMIT--
AUTHORIZATION--RESTRICTIONS.--
A. A licensee with a winegrower's license or a
person licensed in a state other than New Mexico that holds a
winery license may apply to the director for and the director
may issue to the applicant a direct wine shipment permit. An
.234068.1
- 6 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
application for a direct wine shipment permit shall include:
(1) contact information for the applicant in a
form required by the department;
(2) an annual application fee of fifty dollars
($50.00) if the applicant does not hold a winegrower's license;
(3) the number of the applicant's winegrower's
license if the applicant is located in New Mexico or a copy of
the applicant's winery license if the applicant is located in a
state other than New Mexico; and
(4) any other information or documents
required by the director. Upon approval of an applicant for a
permit, the director shall forward to the taxation and revenue
department the name of each permittee and the contact
information for the permittee.
B. A direct wine shipment permit shall be valid for
a permit year. A permittee shall renew a direct wine shipment
permit annually as required by the department to continue
making direct shipments of wine to New Mexico residents.
C. A permittee may ship:
(1) not more than two nine-liter cases of wine
monthly to a New Mexico resident who is twenty-one years of age

or older for the recipient's personal consumption or use, but 22
not for resale; and

(2) wine directly to a New Mexico resident

only in containers that are conspicuously labeled with the

.234068.1
- 7 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
words:
"CONTAINS ALCOHOL
SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OR OLDER REQUIRED
FOR DELIVERY".
D. A permittee shall:
(1) register with the taxation and revenue
department for the payment of the liquor excise tax, liquor
excise surtax and gross receipts taxes due on the sales of wine
pursuant to the permittee's activities in New Mexico;
(2) submit to the jurisdiction of New Mexico
courts to resolve legal actions that arise from the shipping by
the permittee of wine into New Mexico to New Mexico residents;
(3) monthly, by the twenty-fifth day of each
month following the month in which the permittee was issued a
direct wine shipment permit, pay to the taxation and revenue
department the liquor excise tax, [due] liquor excise surtax
and [the] gross receipts tax due; and
(4) submit to an audit by an agent of the
taxation and revenue department of the permittee's records of
the wine shipped pursuant to this section to New Mexico
residents upon notice and during usual business hours.
E. As used in this section:
(1) "permit year" means the period between

July 1 and June 30 of a year; and

(2) "permittee" means a person that is the

.234068.1
- 8 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
S___/SB 280
holder of a direct wine shipment permit."
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the
provisions of this act is July 1, 2026.
- 9 -





















.234068.1